Maine, session 132, LD607.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2015, c. 448, §10, is further
amended to read:
6. Transfer students. The following provisions apply to transfers of students from
one school administrative unit to another.
A. Two superintendents may shall approve the transfer of a student from one school
administrative unit to another if:
(1) They find that a transfer is in the student's best interest; and
(2) The student's parent approves.; and
(3) The superintendent of the receiving school administrative unit has determined
the school administrative unit has the capacity to enroll the student pursuant to
paragraph H.
The superintendents shall notify the commissioner of any transfer approved under this
paragraph. The student's parent or legal guardian is responsible for providing
transportation to the receiving school administrative unit. If either of the
superintendents decides not to approve the transfer the superintendent of the receiving
school administrative unit determines that the school administrative unit does not have
the capacity to enroll the student pursuant to subparagraph (3), that superintendent shall
provide to the parent of the student requesting transfer under this paragraph a written
description of the basis of that superintendent's determination.
B. On the request of the parent of a student requesting transfer under paragraph A, the
commissioner shall review the transfer. The commissioner shall review the
superintendents' determinations and communicate with the superintendents and with
the parent of the student prior to making a decision. The commissioner may approve
or disapprove the transfer and shall provide to the parent of the student and to the
superintendents a written decision describing the basis of the commissioner's
determination.
C. The superintendents shall annually review any transfer under this subsection.
D. For purposes of the state school subsidy, a student transferred under this subsection
is considered a resident of the school administrative unit to which transferred. Upon
request of the superintendent of schools in the unit in which a student is placed in
accordance with this subsection, the state share percentage for subsidized educational
costs for that student is equivalent to the state share percentage of the unit in which the
student's parent or legal guardian resides or the average state share percentage,
whichever is greater. If the parent or legal guardian does not reside in the State or can
not be located, the subsidy is the state average subsidy.
E. A school administrative unit may not charge tuition for a transfer approved under
this subsection.
F. If dissatisfied with the commissioner's decision, a parent of a student requesting
transfer or either superintendent may, within 10 calendar days of the commissioner's
decision, request that the state board review the transfer. The state board shall review
the superintendents' determinations and communicate with the commissioner, the
Page 1 - 132LR0341(01)

413 superintendents and the parent of the student. The state board may approve or
424 disapprove the transfer. The state board shall make a decision within 45 calendar days
435 of receiving the request and shall provide to the parent of the student, the
446 superintendents and the commissioner a written decision describing the basis of the
457 state board's determination. The state board's decision is final and binding.
G. Notwithstanding paragraph D, if the commissioner or state board approves a
transfer under this subsection and the student subject to the transfer is receiving special
education services, the state subsidy of special education costs for the transferred
student may not be reduced as a result of the transfer.
H. A transfer under this subsection must be approved if the receiving school
administrative unit has adequate physical space to enroll the student and enrolling the
student would not require additional staff.
A transfer under this subsection may not be made to a receiving school administrative unit
that does not operate a public school that includes the grade level of the student whose
parent requests the transfer, unless the superintendents of both the sending and receiving
school administrative units approve the transfer.